Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION PRACTICES; DUTIES

Note

Transfer of rights, powers, duties, etc. relating to the
office of information practices from the office of the lieutenant governor to
the department of accounting and general services. L 2015, c 92, §§6 to 9.

Law Journals and Reviews

2013 Law and Administrative Rules Governing Appeal Procedures
of Hawaii's Office of Information Practices. 36 UH L. Rev. 271 (2014).

§92F-41 Office of information practices;
established. (a) There is established an office of information practices within
the department of accounting and general services for administrative purposes;
provided that:

(1) Any quasi-judicial functions of the office of
information practices shall not be subject to the approval, review, or control
of the comptroller; and

(2) The comptroller shall not have the power to
supervise or control the office of information practices in the exercise of its
functions, duties, and powers under section 92F-42.

(b) The governor shall appoint a director of
the office of information practices to be its chief executive officer and who
shall be exempt from chapter 76.

(c) All powers and duties of the office of
information practices are vested in the director and may be delegated to any
other officer or employee of the office.

(d) The director may employ any other
personnel that are necessary, including attorneys and clerical staff. The
office of information practices shall follow and be subject to all applicable
personnel laws. All personnel of the office of information practices shall be
employed without regard to chapter 76.

(e) The office of information practices shall
make direct communications with the governor and legislature. [L 1988, c 262,
pt of §1; am L 1989, c 192, §9; am L 1998, c 137, §4; am L 2000, c 253, §150;
am L 2015, c 92, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next